Utah statutes.
39-1-18.   Joint forces headquarters deputy commander -- Assistant adjutant
general for the army -- Assistant adjutant general for air -- Officer for
permanent duty as personnel officer.
(1)  There is authorized a joint forces headquarters deputy commander.
(a)  The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, may detail the
joint forces headquarters deputy commander.
(b)  The deputy commander of the joint forces headquarters shall be a field
grade federally recognized commissioned officer of the Utah National Guard
with not less than five years military service in the armed forces of the
state or of the United States, at least three of which shall have been
commissioned in the Utah National Guard.  The officer shall:
(i)  hold office at the pleasure of the adjutant general; and
(ii)  devote all of his time during office hours of the military department to
the duties of the office.
(2)  There is authorized an assistant adjutant general for the army and an
assistant adjutant general for air.
(a)  The adjutant general with the approval of the governor may detail the
assistant adjutant general for the army or the assistant adjutant general for
air for permanent duty.
(b)  The assistant adjutant general for the army and the assistant adjutant
general for air shall be federally recognized field grade commissioned
officers of the Utah National Guard with not less than five years military
service in the armed forces of the state or of the United States, at least
three of which shall have been commissioned in the Utah National Guard.  The
officer shall:
(i)  hold office at the pleasure of the adjutant general; and
(ii)  devote all of his time during office hours of the military department to
the duties of the office.
(3)  The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, may detail one
officer of the Utah National Guard for permanent duty as the personnel
officer.
(a)  The officer shall be a federally recognized commissioned officer, or
former federally recognized commissioned officer, of the Utah National Guard
with not less than three years military service in the armed forces of the
state or of the United States, one of which shall have been commissioned in
the Utah National Guard.
(b)  The officer shall hold office at the pleasure of the adjutant general.
(c)  The duties of the personnel officer shall be as the adjutant general may
direct, to include the normal duty of the staff G-1.
(d)  The officer shall devote all of his time during the office hours of the
military department to the duties of the office.
